Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Chapter 21

County Conservation Boards

11-21-101. Purpose.

The purposes of this chapter are to create a county conservation board and to authorize counties to acquire, develop, maintain, and make available to the inhabitants of the county, public parks, preserves, parkways, playgrounds, recreational centers, county forests, wildlife areas and other conservation areas, and to promote and preserve the health and general welfare of the people, to encourage the orderly development and conservation of natural resources, and to cultivate good citizenship by providing adequate programs of public recreation.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1101.

11-21-102. Creation of county conservation boards — Alternative methods of creating — Members — Terms.

Upon petition of not less than two hundred (200) qualified voters in any county to the county legislative body thereof, the county legislative body shall submit to the people of the county at the next general county-wide election the question of whether a county conservation board shall be created as provided for in this chapter. If at the election the majority of votes polled are for the creation of a county conservation board, the county legislative body shall within sixty (60) days after the election, create a county conservation board. In the alternative, the county legislative body in any county may, by a majority of all its members, also create a county conservation board in that county, as provided for in this chapter, without petition and referendum. As a further alternative, any county having a population of more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand (287,000) according to the 1980 federal census may, by a majority vote of all the members of the county legislative body, adopt chapter 24 of this title, for the effective management of a parks and recreation department. Furthermore, these alternative provisions relating to counties of populations greater than two hundred eighty-seven thousand (287,000) and to chapter 24 of this title shall have no effect unless the county legislative body approves by a two-thirds (2/3) vote a resolution accepting as applicable these provisions. Approval or nonapproval of such resolution shall be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the legislative body, and certified by the presiding officer to the secretary of state.

If created by any of these three (3) methods, the board shall consist of a minimum of five (5) bona fide residents up to a maximum of nine (9) bona fide residents of such county. The members shall hold office for staggered terms, not to exceed five (5) years, as indicated and fixed by the county legislative body. When any member of the board, during the term of office, shall cease to be a bona fide resident of the county, such member shall thereby be disqualified as a member of the board and such member's office shall thereupon be declared vacant. Members of the board shall be selected and appointed on the basis of their demonstrated interest in conservation matters and shall serve without compensation, but may be paid their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 2; 1967, ch. 388, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(140); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 11-1102; Acts 1984, ch. 813, § 5; 2005, ch. 83, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Dissolution of boards, § 11-21-110.

11-21-103. Officers of board — Meetings — Powers — Annual report.

Within thirty (30) days after their appointment, the county conservation board shall organize by selecting from its members a president and secretary and such other officers as are deemed necessary, who shall hold office for the calendar year in which elected and until their successors are selected and qualified. A majority of the members to which the board is entitled shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall hold regular monthly meetings; provided, however, that by majority vote of the membership, the board may hold meetings less frequently based on the needs of the county, but not less frequently than quarterly. Special meetings may be called by the president, and shall be called on the request of a majority of members, as necessity may require. The board shall have power to adopt bylaws, to adopt and use a common seal, and to enter into contracts. The county legislative body shall provide suitable offices for the meetings of the board and for the safekeeping of its records. Such records shall be subject to public inspection at all reasonable hours and under such regulations as the board may prescribe. The board shall annually make a full and complete report to the county legislative body of its transactions and operations for the preceding year. Such report shall contain a full statement of its receipts, disbursements, and the program of work for the period covered, and may include such recommendations as may be deemed advisable. A copy of this report shall be filed with the commissioner of environment and conservation.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 11-1103; Acts 2005, ch. 83, § 3; 2009, ch. 496, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

11-21-104. Powers of board — Executive officer.

The county conservation board has the custody, control and management of all real and personal property heretofore or hereafter acquired by the county for public parks, preserves, parkways, playgrounds, recreation centers, county forests, county wildlife areas, and other county conservation and recreation purposes and is authorized and empowered:

To study and ascertain the county's park, preserve, parkway, and recreation and other conservation facilities, the need for such facilities, and the extent to which such needs are being currently met, and to prepare and adopt a coordinated plan of areas and facilities to meet such needs;

To acquire in the name of the county by gift, purchase, lease, agreement or otherwise in fee or with conditions, suitable real estate within or without the territorial limits of the county areas of land and water for public parks, preserves, parkways, playgrounds, recreation centers, forests, wildlife and other conservation purposes. The commissioner of environment and conservation, the county legislative body, or the governing body of any city or town may, upon request of the board, designate, set apart and transfer to the board for use as parks, preserves, parkways, playgrounds, recreation centers, playfields, tennis courts, skating rinks, swimming pools, gymnasiums, rooms for arts and crafts, camps and meeting places, community forests, wildlife areas and other recreational purposes, any lands and buildings owned or controlled by the state or such county or municipality and not devoted or dedicated to any other inconsistent public use. In acquiring or accepting land, due consideration shall be given to its scenic, historic, archaeologic, recreational or other special features, and no land shall be acquired or accepted which in the opinion of the board is of low value from the standpoint of its proposed use. No existing state parks, playgrounds, or recreation centers shall be transferred to the board without the consent of the county legislative body or, if the area is within the incorporated limits of any city or town, without the consent of the governing body of the city or town;

The board shall file with and obtain approval of the commissioner of environment and conservation on all proposals for acquisition of land, and all general development plans and programs for the improvement and maintenance thereof before any such program is executed;

To plan, develop, preserve, administer and maintain all such areas, places and facilities, and construct, reconstruct, alter and renew buildings and other structures, and equip and maintain the same;

To accept in the name of the county gifts, bequests, contributions and appropriations of money and other personal property for conservation purposes;

To employ and fix the compensation of an executive officer who shall be responsible to the board for the carrying out of its policies. The executive officer has the power, subject to the approval of the board, to employ and fix the compensation of such assistants and employees as may be deemed necessary for carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, but all such expenditures shall be within the limitation of funds available for that purpose;

To charge a reasonable fee for the use of a park or recreation facility or for participation in a recreation program conducted at a facility operated by a conservation board or sponsored by the board and held at another location. A conservation board may engage in the sale of concessions, food, beverages and the like in conjunction with such programs, facilities or events. A board may contract with a private or nonprofit vendor for such concessions provision. In all cases receipts from such concession operations must be adequately accounted for and profits may not inure to private groups or individuals except as reasonable compensation for contracted service provided; and

To let out and rent privileges in or upon any property under its control upon such terms and conditions as are deemed by it to be in the public interest.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 11-1104; Acts 1984, ch. 813, § 1; 2013, ch. 93, § 4.

11-21-105. Rules and regulations.

The county conservation board may make, alter, amend or repeal rules and regulations for the protection, regulation and control of all parks, preserves, parkways, playgrounds, recreation centers, and other property under its control. No rules and regulations adopted shall be contrary to, or inconsistent with, the laws of the state of Tennessee. The board may designate the executive officer and such employees as the executive officer may designate as police officers who shall have all the powers conferred by law on police officers, peace officers, or sheriffs in the enforcement of the laws of the state of Tennessee and the apprehension of violators thereof.

In counties having a population of less than six hundred thousand (600,000) according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, such rules and regulations shall not take effect until ten (10) days after their adoption by the board and after their publication once a week for two (2) weeks in at least one (1) paper circulating in the county, and after a copy thereof has been posted near each gate or principal entrance to the public ground to which they apply. In counties having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, such rules and regulations shall not take effect until thirty (30) days after their adoption by the board and after the same have been approved by the commissioner of environment and conservation.

In counties having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, all rules and regulations adopted by any board, after due notice in accordance with this section and a copy thereof having been recorded with the commissioner, shall be subject to enforcement by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each violation against any person found guilty of violating such rules and regulations. Any violation of the rules and regulations for the care and management of such property of county conservation boards as may be made under the authority of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

No county conservation board shall require that any parks, preserves, parkways, playgrounds, recreation centers and other property under its control be named in dedication only to individuals who are deceased at the time of such naming.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 5; 1974, ch. 509, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 11-1105; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2009, ch. 500, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

11-21-106. Appropriations — Tax levy — Recreation and conservation tax — County conservation fund — Bonds in anticipation of tax.

Upon the adoption of any county of this chapter, the legislative body of such county may appropriate an amount of money from the general fund of the county in carrying out its powers and duties, and it may levy or cause to be levied an annual tax, in addition to all other taxes, which tax shall be collected by the county trustee as other taxes are collected, and shall be paid into a separate and distinct fund to be known as the “county conservation fund,” to be paid out upon the warrants drawn by the county mayor or other county fiscal officer upon requisition of the county conservation board for the payment of expenses incurred in carrying out the powers and duties of the board.

The board has no power or authority to contract any debt or obligation in any year in excess of the moneys on hand immediately available for such purposes. Gifts, contributions and bequests of money and all rent, licenses, fees and charges and other revenue or money received or collected by the board shall be deposited in the county conservation fund to be used for the purchase of land, property and equipment and the payment of expenses incurred in carrying out the activities of the board, except that moneys given, bequeathed or contributed upon specified trusts shall be held and applied in accordance with the trust specified.

In order to make immediately available to the board the proceeds of the annual tax hereinbefore authorized to be levied for recreation and conservation purposes, bonds of any county may be issued in anticipation of the collection of such tax in the manner hereinafter provided. Upon the filing of a petition by the board with the county legislative body asking that bonds be issued in a specified amount for the purpose of paying the cost of acquiring land and developing the same for public park, parkway, preserve, playground, or other recreation or conservation purposes within the county, then the county legislative body may call a special election to be held in the county to vote on the proposition of issuing such bonds. Notice of such election shall be published once each week for at least four (4) consecutive weeks in one (1) of the official county newspapers, and the election shall be held on a day not less than five (5) nor more than twenty (20) days after the last publication of such notice. The proposition shall be submitted in substantially the following form:

“Shall County, Tennessee, issue its bonds in the amount of for the purpose of ?”

The expenses incurred in connection with the conduct of such election shall be paid by the board from the county conservation fund. If the vote in favor of issuing the bonds is equal to at least sixty percent (60%) of the total votes cast for and against the proposition, the county legislative body shall issue the bonds in the amount voted, and shall provide for the levy of an annual tax, within the limits of the special tax hereinbefore authorized, sufficient to pay the bonds and the interest thereon as the same respectively become due. The bonds shall mature in not more than twenty (20) years, shall bear interest at such rate or rates and shall be in such form as the county legislative body shall by resolution provide, and shall be payable as to both principal and interest from the proceeds of the annual tax levy hereinbefore authorized to be levied for recreation and conservation purposes, or so much thereof as will be sufficient to pay the principal thereof and interest thereon, and prior to the authorization and issuance of such bonds, the county legislative body may, with or without notice, negotiate and enter into an agreement or agreements with any bank, investment banker, trust company or insurance company or group thereof whereunder the marketing of such bonds may be assured and consummated. The proceeds of such bonds shall be deposited in a special fund, to be kept separate and apart from all other funds of the county, and shall be paid out upon warrants drawn by the county mayor or other fiscal officer of the county, upon requisition of the board to pay the cost of acquiring land and developing the same for recreation and conservation purposes as specified in the election proposition.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed to limit the authority of the county legislative body to levy the recreation and conservation tax, but if and to whatever extent the tax is levied in any year in excess of the amount of the principal and interest falling due in such year on the bonds, the first available proceeds thereof, to an amount sufficient to meet maturing installments of principal of and interest on such bonds, shall be paid into the sinking fund for such bonds before any of such taxes are deposited in the county conservation fund or are otherwise made available to the board, and the amount required to be annually set aside to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds shall constitute a first charge upon all of the proceeds of such annual special tax, which tax shall be pledged to pay the bonds and the interest thereon.

This chapter shall be construed as supplemental and in addition to existing statutory authority and as providing an independent method of financing the cost of acquiring land and developing the same for public park, parkway, preserve, playground, or other recreation or conservation purposes, and for the issuance and sale of bonds in connection therewith, and shall not be construed as subject to any other law. The fact that a county may have bonds previously issued and outstanding under authority of this chapter shall not prevent such county from issuing additional bonds hereunder.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A., § 11-1106; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 8; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, § 47-14-103.

11-21-107. Cooperation with federal, state, and local agencies.

Any county conservation board may cooperate with the federal government or the state government or any department or agency thereof, including the Tennessee Valley authority and the United States army corps of engineers, to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. Any county conservation board may join with any other county board or county boards to carry out this chapter, and to that end may enter into agreements with each other and may do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and to cooperate in carrying out this chapter. Any city, town, or school district may aid and cooperate with any county conservation board or any combination thereof in equipping, operating and maintaining any parks, preserves, parkways, playgrounds, recreation centers, and conservation areas, and for providing, conducting and supervising programs of activities, and may appropriate money for such purposes. The department of environment and conservation, county agricultural agent, and other county officials shall render such assistance as shall not interfere with their regular employment. The county legislative body is authorized to make available to the use of the county conservation board, county-owned equipment and operators and any county-owned materials it deems advisable.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 11-1107.

11-21-108. Use of school buildings, grounds or equipment.

Any county board of education or the governing body of any special school district may grant the use of any buildings, grounds, or equipment of the district to any county conservation board for the purpose of carrying out this chapter whenever such use of the school buildings, grounds or equipment for such purposes will not interfere with the use of the buildings, grounds, and equipment for any purpose of the public school system.

The departments of environment and conservation and education shall assist county conservation boards with a positive program of technical advice so as to assure that school officials and county conservation boards cooperate in making school facilities available for recreational purposes. In providing this service, such departments shall work cooperatively with the Tennessee School Boards Association and the Tennessee Parks and Recreation Association. All state and local officials working in furtherance of this subsection (b) shall take due notice of the model Tennessee agreement between school boards and parks and recreation agencies as jointly published by the Tennessee School Boards Association and the Tennessee Parks and Recreation Association and as this document may be, from time to time, amended. A current copy of this document with amendments shall be kept on file in the office of the parks and recreation technical advisory service.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 8; T.C.A., § 11-1108; Acts 1989, ch. 23, § 2.

11-21-109. Departments of environment and conservation and education to advise and assist counties.

The departments of environment and conservation and education shall advise with and may assist any county or counties in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1961, ch. 213, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-1109.

11-21-110. Dissolution of boards.

A county conservation board created by petition and election as provided for in § 11-21-102 may only be dissolved after an election on the issue of dissolution. In the case that there has been an election on the issue of dissolution and a majority of the voters vote for dissolution, the board shall not be dissolved unless a resolution for dissolution be passed by the county legislative body.

A county conservation board created solely by action of the county legislative body may be dissolved by similar action. Notice of an action to dissolve such board must be given to the chair of such board at least thirty (30) days preceding a vote by the legislative body on the issue. Public notice of such pending action must also be given by notification published in the newspaper of circulation in the county on at least two (2) occasions within the thirty-day period preceding the vote by the legislative body.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a board may be dissolved by action of the commissioner of environment and conservation after adequate hearing held after sixty (60) days written notice given to the county mayor and members of the board and upon any of the following findings:

The board has not met within a period of six (6) months;

A majority of the positions of the board members are unfilled or unappointed or a majority of persons on the board are sitting due to the failure of the county legislative body to appoint a successor;

The board has failed to file its annual report with the commissioner for two (2) successive years; or

Other similar findings which would indicate that the board is no longer bona fide or active.

Acts 1984, ch. 813, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

11-21-111. Board to provide assistance to small cities and towns.

The county conservation board shall be considered the parks and recreation providing agency for certain small cities and towns excluded from the general application of chapter 24 of this title. Such boards shall work cooperatively with these cities and towns. A small city or town desiring parks and recreation services shall enter into an agreement pursuant to § 11-24-105 with the board. The board shall develop and maintain parks and recreation facilities and programs within the jurisdiction of such small city or town according to this agreement.

Acts 1984, ch. 813, § 3.

11-21-112. Joint municipal or county systems.

To effect § 11-21-107 and this chapter, county conservation boards desiring to cooperate with the conservation board of another county or with the parks and recreation board of a municipality, created pursuant to § 11-24-104(a), or with a municipality operating a parks and recreation system created under § 11-24-103, shall enter into an agreement pursuant to title 12, chapter 9, the Interlocal Cooperation Act, with the cooperating party.

Acts 1984, ch. 813, § 4.